Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1247.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6145. Prohibition of deception during custodial interrogation of individual with intellectual disability or autism.(a) Prohibition.--A law enforcement officer may not use deception during a custodial interrogation of an individual with an intellectual disability or autism.(b) Confession inadmissible.--An oral, a written or a sign language confession of an individual with an intellectual disability or autism made as the result of a custodial interrogation conducted at a police station or other place of detention on or after the effective date of this section shall 12345678910111213141516171819 be presumed to be inadmissible as evidence against the individual making the confession in a criminal proceeding or a juvenile court proceeding for an act that, if committed by an adult, would be a misdemeanor offense or felony offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) if, during the custodial interrogation, a law enforcement officer knowingly engages in deception. The following apply:(1) The presumption of inadmissibility of the confession may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence that the confession was voluntarily given, based on the totality of the circumstances.(2) The burden of going forward with the evidence and the burden of proving that the confession was voluntary shall be on the Commonwealth.(3) An objection to the failure of the Commonwealth to call all material witnesses on the issue of whether the confession was voluntary must be made in the trial court.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult." An individual who is 18 years of age or older."Custodial interrogation." An interrogation of an individual during which:(1) the freedom of movement of the individual is restrained by a law enforcement officer, even if the individual is not under arrest, as determined by a reasonable person under similar circumstances; and(2) a question is asked that is reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from the individual."Deception." The knowing communication of false facts about 20250HB1247PN1396 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evidence or unauthorized statements regarding leniency by a law enforcement officer to an individual subject to custodial interrogation."Individual with an intellectual disability or autism." As defined in section 5992 (relating to definitions)."Law enforcement officer." As defined in section 5950(d) (relating to confidential communications involving law enforcement officers)."Minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Place of detention." A building or police station that is a place of operation for a State or municipal police department, county sheriff department or any other law enforcement agency at which individuals are or may be held in detention in connection with criminal charges or allegations that those individuals are delinquent minors.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1247PN1396 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516